Missouri, session 2026, SB1787.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 161.412, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 161.412,
to read as follows:
161.412. 1. Subject to appropriations, the Missouri
commission for the deaf and hard of hearing shall provide
grants to:
(1) Organizations that provide services for deaf-blind
children and their families. Such services may include
providing family support advocates to assist deaf-blind
children in participating in their communities and family
education specialists to teach parents and siblings skills
to support the deaf-blind children in their family;
(2) Organizations that provide services for deaf-blind
adults. Such grants shall be used to provide assistance to
deaf-blind adults who are working towards establishing and
maintaining independence; and
(3) Organizations that train support service
providers. Such grants shall be used to provide training
that will lead to certification of support service providers
in Missouri.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1787 2
2. The commission shall use a request-for-proposal
process to award the grants in this section. Organizations
that receive grants under this section may expend the grant
for any purpose authorized in this section. [The total
amount of grants provided under this section shall not
exceed three hundred thousand dollars annually.]
✓